Utah statutes.
4-25-14.   Impounded livestock -- Determination and location of owner --
Sale -- Disposition of proceeds -- Notice -- Title of purchaser -- Immunity
from liability.
(1)  As used in this section, "impounded livestock" means the following
animals seized and retained in legal custody:
(a)  cattle;
(b)  calves;
(c)  horses;
(d)  mules;
(e)  sheep;
(f)  goats;
(g)  hogs; or
(h)  domesticated elk.
(2) (a)  A county may:
(i)  take physical possession of impounded livestock seized and retained
within its boundaries; and
(ii)  attempt to determine the name and location of the impounded livestock's
owner.
(b)  The department shall assist a county who requests help in locating the
name and location of the owner or other person responsible for the impounded
livestock.
(c) (i)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Title 67, Chapter 4a, Unclaimed
Property Act, if the county cannot determine ownership of the impounded
livestock, or, if having determined ownership, neither the county nor the
department is able to locate the owner within a reasonable period of time, the
impounded livestock shall be sold at a livestock or other appropriate market.
(ii)  The proceeds of a sale under Subsection (2)(c)(i), less the costs
described in Subsection (2)(c)(iii), shall be paid to the State School Fund
created by the Utah Constitution Article X, Section 5, Subsection (1).
(iii)  The livestock or other market conducting the sale under Subsection
(2)(c)(i) may deduct the cost of feed, transportation, and other market costs
from the proceeds of the sale.
(3)  A county shall publish the intended sale of the impounded livestock:
(a)  at least 10 days prior to the date of sale; and
(b)  in a publication with general circulation within the county where the
impounded livestock was taken into custody.
(4)  A purchaser of impounded livestock sold under this section shall receive
title to the impounded livestock free and clear of all claims of the
livestock's owner or a person claiming title through the owner.
(5)  If a county complies with the provisions of this section, it is immune
from liability for the sale of impounded livestock sold at a livestock or
other appropriate market.
(6)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(c), a county may
employ a licensed veterinarian to euthanize an impounded livestock if the
licensed veterinarian determines that the impounded livestock's physical
condition prevents the impounded livestock from being sold.
